Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4033.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-491, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-491. Elections on school property; exceptions A. The governing board of a school district may, and on petition of fifteen percent of the school electors as shown by the poll list at the last preceding annual school election shall, call an election for the following purposes: 1. To locate or change the location of school buildings. 2. To purchase or sell school sites or buildings or sell school sites pursuant to section 15-342 or to build school buildings, but the authorization by vote of the school district shall not necessarily specify the site to be purchased. 3. To decide whether the bonds of the school district shall be issued and sold for the purpose of raising monies for purchasing or leasing school lots, for building or renovating school buildings, for supplying school buildings with furniture, equipment and technology, for improving school grounds, for purchasing pupil transportation vehicles or for liquidating any indebtedness already incurred for such purposes. Bonds issued for furniture, equipment and technology, other than fixtures, shall mature not later than the July 1 that follows the fifth year after the bonds were issued. A school district shall not issue class B bonds until the school district has obligated in contract the entire proceeds of any class A bonds issued by the school district. The total amount of class A and class B bonds issued by a school district shall not exceed the debt limitations prescribed in article IX, sections 8 and 8.1, Constitution of Arizona. 4. To lease for twenty or more years, as lessor or as lessee, school buildings or grounds. Approval by a majority of the school district electors voting authorizes the governing board to negotiate for and enter into a lease. The ballot shall list the school buildings or grounds for which a lease is sought. If the governing board does not enter into a lease of twenty or more years of the school buildings or grounds listed on the ballot within twenty years after the date of the election and the board continues to seek such a lease, the governing board shall call a special election to reauthorize the board to negotiate for and to enter into a lease of twenty or more years. 5. To change the list of capital projects or the purposes authorized by prior voter approval to issue bonds. 6. To extend from six to ten years the time period to issue class B bonds authorized in 2009 or earlier. Elections pursuant to this paragraph may not be held later than the sixth November after the election approving the issuance of the bonds. B. A petition is not required for holding the first election to be held in a joint common school district for any of the purposes specified in subsection A of this section. The certification of election results required by section 15-493 shall be made to the board of supervisors of the jurisdictional county. C. When the election is called to determine whether or not bonds of the school district shall be issued and sold for the purposes enumerated in the call for the election, the question shall be submitted to the vote of the qualified electors of the school district as defined in section 15-401 and subject to section 15-402. D. The governing board shall order the election to be held and the election notice and procedures to be conducted in the manner prescribed in title 35, chapter 3, article 3. If a petition for an election has been filed with the governing board as provided in subsection A of this section, the board shall act on the petition within sixty days by ordering the election to be held as provided in this subsection. If a school district bond election is scheduled for the same date a school district will hold an override election, the governing body shall deliver a copy of the notice of election and ballot to the county school superintendent who shall include the notice of election and ballot with the informational pamphlet and ballot prepared for the override election. Mailing of the information required for both the override and bond elections shall constitute compliance with the notice provisions of this section. E. The elections to be held pursuant to this section shall only be held on dates prescribed by section 16-204, except that elections held pursuant to this section to decide whether class B bonds shall be issued, or any other obligation incurred that will require the assessment of secondary property taxes, shall only be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November. F. Subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section does not apply to the sale of school property if the market value of the school property is less than $50,000. G. Bond counsel fees, financial advisory fees, printing costs and paying agent and registrar fees for bonds issued pursuant to an election under this section shall be paid from either the amount authorized by the qualified electors of the school district or current operating funds. Bond election expenses shall be paid from current operating funds only. H. For any election conducted to decide whether class B bonds will be issued pursuant to this section: 1. Except as provided in paragraph 2 of this subsection, the ballot shall include the following statement: The capital improvements that are proposed to be funded through this bond issuance are to exceed the state standards and are in addition to monies provided by the state. __________ school district is proposing to issue class B general obligation bonds totaling $__________ to fund capital improvements over and above those funded by the state. Under the students first capital funding system, _________ school district is entitled to state monies for new construction and renovation of school buildings in accordance with state law. Additional information and a description of each proposed capital improvement that will be funded through this bond issuance can be found in the informational pamphlet mailed by the school district. 2. For a school district that is a career technical education district, the ballot shall include the following statement: ________, a career technical education district, is proposing to issue class B general obligation bonds totaling $_________ to fund capital improvements at a campus owned or operated and maintained by the career technical education district. 3. The ballot shall conform to the requirements of title 35, chapter 3, article 3. 4. At least eighty-five days before the election, the school district shall submit proposed ballot language to the county school superintendent and the director of the Arizona legislative council. The director of the Arizona legislative council shall review the proposed ballot language to determine whether the proposed ballot language complies with this section. If the director of the Arizona legislative council determines that the proposed ballot language does not comply with this section, the director, within ten calendar days after receiving the proposed ballot language, shall notify the school district and the county school superintendent of the director's objections, and the school district shall resubmit revised ballot language to the director for approval. 5. Not later than thirty-five days before a class B bond election conducted pursuant to this section, the school district shall mail an informational pamphlet prepared by the county school superintendent to each household that contains a qualified elector in the school district. The informational pamphlet shall contain, at a minimum, the following information: (a) An executive summary of the school district's most recent capital plan submitted to the school facilities oversight board. (b) A complete list of each proposed capital improvement that will be funded with the proceeds of the bonds and a description of the proposed cost of each improvement, including a separate aggregation of capital improvements for administrative purposes as defined by the school facilities oversight board. (c) The tax rate associated with each of the proposed capital improvements and the estimated cost of each capital improvement for the owner of a single family home that is valued at $100,000. (d) A complete list of each proposed capital improvement that will be funded with the proceeds of the bonds and a description of the proposed cost of each improvement, including a separate aggregation of the capital improvements for administrative purposes as defined by the school facilities oversight board. The list must detail each specific proposed capital improvement that will be funded with the proceeds of the bonds and must include all of the following: (i) A description of the improvement, including whether bond proceeds will be used to acquire land, to make improvements to land, to construct a new school facility, to improve existing school facilities or to pay for transportation costs. (ii) The anticipated cost of the improvement. (iii) The location of the improvement. For costs to acquire or improve land, the description of the location may detail the general physical location of THE improvement. (e) A description of each proposed improvement, categorized by one of the following: (i) High school expansion and elementary school enhancements, including playgrounds, athletic facilities, campus security, furniture, technology and equipment. (ii) Renovations, repairs and infrastructure upgrades, including furniture, technology and equipment. (iii) Pupil transportation and maintenance vehicles. (iv) Transportation, maintenance and administrative facilities improvements, including furniture, technology and equipment. (f) The specific projects the school district will undertake for Each proposed improvement. (g) For each category prescribed in subdivision (e) of this paragraph, The percentage of the category's total cost relative to the total proceeds of the bonds. The percentage is calculated by dividing the estimated cost of each proposed improvement by the total amount of the proceeds of the bonds and multiplying the quotient by one hundred. I. For any election conducted to decide whether impact aid revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to this section: 1. The ballot shall include the following statement: The capital improvements that are proposed to be funded through this bond issuance are to exceed the state standards and are in addition to monies provided by the state. __________ school district is proposing to issue impact aid revenue bonds totaling $__________ to fund capital improvements over and above those funded by the state. Under the students first capital funding system, _________ school district is entitled to state monies for new construction and renovation of school buildings in accordance with state law. 2. The ballot shall contain the words "bond approval, yes" and "bond approval, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. 3. At least eighty-five days before the election, the school district shall submit proposed ballot language to the director of the legislative council. The director of the legislative council shall review the proposed ballot language to determine whether the proposed ballot language complies with this section. If the director of the legislative council determines that the proposed ballot language does not comply with this section, the director, within ten calendar days after receiving the proposed ballot language, shall notify the school district of the director's objections, and the school district shall resubmit revised ballot language to the director for approval. 4. Not later than thirty-five days before an impact aid revenue bond election conducted pursuant to this section, the school district shall mail an informational pamphlet prepared by the county school superintendent to each household that contains a qualified elector in the school district. The informational pamphlet shall contain, at a minimum, the following information: (a) The date of the election. (b) The voter's polling place and the times it is open. (c) An executive summary of the school district's most recent capital plan submitted to the school facilities oversight board. (d) A complete list of each proposed capital improvement that will be funded with the proceeds of the bonds and a description of the proposed cost of each improvement, including a separate aggregation of capital improvements for administrative purposes as defined by the school facilities oversight board. (e) A statement that impact aid revenue bonds will be fully funded by aid that the school district receives from the federal government and do not require a levy of taxes in the district. (f) A statement that if the bonds are approved, the first priority for the impact aid will be to pay the debt service for the bonds and that other uses of the monies are prohibited until the debt service obligation is met. (g) A statement that if the impact aid revenue bonds are approved, the school district shall not issue or sell class B bonds while the district has existing indebtedness from impact aid revenue bonds, except for bonds issued to refund any bonds issued by the board. J. If the voters approve the issuance of school district class B bonds or impact aid revenue bonds, the school district shall not use the bond proceeds for any purposes other than the proposed capital improvements listed in the informational pamphlet, except that up to ten percent of the bond proceeds may be used for general capital expenses, including cost overruns of proposed capital improvements. The proposed capital improvements may be changed by a subsequent election as provided by this section. K. Each school district that issues bonds under this section shall hold a public meeting each year between September 1 and October 31, until the bond proceeds are spent, at which an update of the progress of capital improvements financed through bonding is discussed and at which the public is allowed an opportunity to comment. At a minimum, the update shall include a comparison of the current status and the original projections on the construction of capital improvements, the costs of capital improvements and the costs of capital improvements in progress or completed since the prior meeting and the future capital bonding plans of the school district. The school district shall include in the public meeting a discussion of the school district's use of state capital aid and voter-approved capital overrides in funding capital improvements, if any. L. If an election is held to change the purpose or list of capital projects authorized by prior voter approval to issue bonds pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 5 of this section, the following requirements apply: 1. The election may be held only on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November. 2. Not later than thirty-five days before the election, the school district shall mail an informational pamphlet prepared by the county school superintendent to each household in the school district that contains a qualified elector. The informational pamphlet shall contain, at a minimum, the following information: (a) The date of the election. (b) The voter's polling place and the times it is open. (c) A statement as to why the election was called. (d) A complete list of each proposed capital improvement that is in addition to the initial capital improvements presented in the informational pamphlet when the bonds were approved and the proposed cost of each improvement, including a separate aggregation of capital improvements for administrative purposes as defined by the school facilities oversight board. (e) A complete list of each capital improvement that was presented in the informational pamphlet when the bonds were initially approved and that is proposed to be eliminated or to have its cost reduced, and the proposed cost of each improvement, including a separate aggregation of capital improvements for administrative purposes as defined by the school facilities oversight board. (f) Arguments for and against the proposed change, if submitted, as provided by section 15-481, subsection B, paragraph 9. The ballot arguments for the proposed change shall be signed as the governing board of the school district without listing any member's individual name for the arguments for the proposed change. 3. The ballot shall contain the words "change capital improvements, yes" and "change capital improvements, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. 4. If the election is to add a purpose that was not on the initial ballot, the ballot shall list the purpose that is proposed to be added. M. If an election is held to extend the time to issue bonds pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 6 of this section, the following requirements apply: 1. The election may be held only on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November. 2. Not later than thirty-five days before the election, the school district shall mail an informational pamphlet prepared by the county school superintendent to each household in the school district that contains a qualified elector. The informational pamphlet shall contain, at a minimum, the following information: (a) The date of the election. (b) The voter's polling place and the times it is open. (c) A statement as to why the election was called. (d) Arguments for and against the proposed change, if submitted, as provided in section 15-481, subsection B, paragraph 9. The ballot arguments for the proposed change shall be signed as the governing board of the school district without listing any member's individual name for the arguments for the proposed change. 3. The ballot shall contain the words "extend time to issue bonds, yes" and "extend time to issue bonds, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. N. Notwithstanding any other law, the question of whether to approve the issuance of bonds for the construction, acquisition and equipment of school buildings in the district, the purchase of new school buses and the purchase of necessary sites for school buildings may be submitted to the voters in a single ballot proposition, except that bonds for the following purposes must be stated in a separate proposition: 1. The construction, acquisition or equipment of any of the following: (a) A stadium with seating capacity for more than one thousand spectators. (b) A natatorium. (c) Recreational facility other than a gymnasium, playground or play area. (d) A performing arts facility. (e) Housing for teachers as determined by the district to be necessary to have a sufficient number of teachers for the district. (f) Administrative buildings. 2. An acquisition or update of technology equipment, other than equipment used for school security purposes or technology infrastructure integral to the construction of a facility. O. The question of whether to approve the issuance of bonds for a building described by subsection N, paragraph 1 of this section must be printed on the ballot as a separate ballot proposition regardless of whether that building is proposed as part of the same complex or building that contains traditional classroom facilities. Each separate ballot proposition required by this subsection must state the principal amount of the bonds to be issued that constitutes the cost for construction of that portion of the building or complex attributable to the building described by subsection N, paragraph 1 of this section or to the traditional classroom facilities, as applicable. END_STATUTE